Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4732.01
Telehealth System Fund; created; use; investment.

The Telehealth System Fund is created. The fund shall be used for any expenses related to the operation and maintenance of the telehealth system established in section 71-4728.04. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2001, LB 334, § 2.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.